Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2961
Vacancy on board.

(1) Unless the articles of organization or bylaws otherwise provide, a vacancy on the board of directors shall be filled:

(a) By majority vote of the remaining directors until the next annual members' meeting or special members' meeting held for that purpose; and

(b) For the unexpired term by members at the next annual members' meeting or special members' meeting called for that purpose.

(2) If the vacating director was elected by a group or class of members or by group, class, or district:

(a) The appointed director shall be of that group, class, or district; and

(b) The election of the director for the unexpired term shall be conducted in the same manner as would the election for that position without a vacancy.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 61.